Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 17 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Criminal history records information":
1. Means information collected by criminal justice agencies on
individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of
arrests, indictments, information, or other formal criminal charges,
and any disposition arising therefrom, including sentencing,
correction supervision, and release;
2. Includes information that is sealed pursuant to court order or other
law if the records are accessible by criminal justice agencies for the
purpose of conducting background checks; and
3. Does not include identification information such as fingerprint
records to the extent that the information does not indicate
involvement of the individual in the criminal justice system;
(b) "Criminal justice agency" means:
1. The Kentucky Court of Justice;
2. The Department of Kentucky State Police;
3. Sheriffs;
4. State and local correctional facilities;
5. City, county, urban-county government, charter county government,
consolidated local government, and unified local government police
departments;
6. School resource officer departments;
7. Airport safety and security departments;
Page 1 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1337
8. Any agency or department that employs state officers, listed in KRS
15.420(2)(a)2.; and
9. Any other state or local agency in the Commonwealth of Kentucky
that performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a
statute, executive order, or other law, and which allocates a majority
of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice; and
(c) "Requesting agency" means:
1. The United States Department of Defense;
2. The United States Department of State;
3. The United States Department of Transportation;
4. The United States Office of Personnel Management;
5. The Central Intelligence Agency;
6. The Federal Bureau of Investigation;
7. The United States Department of Homeland Security;
8. The Office of the Director of National Intelligence;
9. An executive agency of the United States that is:
a. Authorized to conduct background investigations under a federal
statute; or
b. Delegated authority to conduct background investigations in
accordance with procedures established by a security executive
agent or a suitability executive agent under subsection (b) or
(c)(iv) of Section 2.3 of Executive Order 13467, 73 Fed. Reg.
38103, or any successor thereto; or
10. A contractor that conducts a background investigation on behalf of an
entity listed in subparagraphs 1. to 9. in this paragraph.
(2) A criminal justice agency shall provide criminal history records information to a
requesting agency when that requesting agency is conducting a basic suitability
Page 2 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1337
or fitness assessment for federal or contractor employees under 5 U.S.C. sec.
9101 and requests that information from the criminal justice agency.
(3) A criminal justice agency may request a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) to be paid
by the requesting agency for reimbursement of expenses related to providing
criminal history records information.
Section 2. KRS 610.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Unless a specific provision of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 specifies otherwise,
all juvenile court records of any nature generated pursuant to KRS Chapters
600 to 645 by any agency or instrumentality, public or private, shall be
deemed to be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the child,
parent, victims, or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing
pursuant to KRS 610.070 unless ordered by the court for good cause.
(b) Juvenile court records which contain information pertaining to arrests,
petitions, adjudications, and dispositions of a child may be disclosed to
victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant
to KRS 610.070.
(c) Release of the child's treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is
prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Any records
resulting from the child's prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-
B of the Federal Social Security Act shall not be disclosed to victims or other
persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS
610.070.
(d) Victim access under this subsection to juvenile court records shall include
access to records of adjudications that occurred prior to July 15, 1998.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to public officers or employees
engaged in the investigation of and in the prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters
600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any record obtained
Page 3 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1337
pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall not be disclosed
publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS
61.870 to 61.884.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any peace officer, as defined in
KRS 446.010, who is engaged in the investigation or prosecution of cases under
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any
record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall
not be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open
Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees of the Department of
Juvenile Justice or cabinet or its designees responsible for any services under KRS
Chapters 600 to 645 or to attorneys for parties involved in actions relating to KRS
Chapters 600 to 645 or other prosecutions authorized by the Kentucky Revised
Statutes.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to records disclosed pursuant to KRS
610.320 or to public or private elementary and secondary school administrative,
transportation, and counseling personnel, to any teacher or school employee with
whom the student may come in contact, or to persons entitled to have juvenile
records under KRS 610.345, if the possession and use of the records is in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 610.345 and this section.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees of local law
enforcement agencies, the Department of Kentucky State Police, or the Federal
Bureau of Investigation engaged in conducting background checks for the sole
purpose of identifying and providing potentially disqualifying juvenile public
offense records to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
pursuant to Div. A, Title II, Sec. 12001(a) of the Bipartisan Safer Communities Act,
Pub. L. No. 117-159. Notwithstanding KRS 635.040, an adjudication for a public
Page 4 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1337
offense is a conviction of a crime for purposes of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(1), (3), or
(9). Any public offense record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for
official use only, not be disclosed publicly, and be exempt from disclosure under
the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not apply to criminal justice agencies
conducting a basic suitability or fitness assessment for federal or contractor
employees under 5 U.S.C. sec. 9101 in accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(8) (a) The provisions of this section shall not apply to records or proceedings in any
case in which a child has made an admission to or been adjudicated for a
violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200 until the expiration of a
three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication.
(b) If the child has not received any additional public offense convictions during
the three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication, all
records in the case shall be automatically sealed and shall not be disclosed
consistent with the provisions of this section.
(c) As used in this subsection, "admission" means a formal admission in a case,
on the record, upon the waiving of an adjudication hearing.
(9)[(8)] No person, including school personnel, shall disclose any confidential record
or any information contained therein except as permitted by this section or other
specific section of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or except as permitted by specific
order of the court.
(10)[(9)] No person, including school personnel, authorized to obtain records pursuant
to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall obtain or attempt to obtain confidential records to
which he or she is not entitled or for purposes for which he or she is not permitted
to obtain them pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(11)[(10)] No person, including school personnel, not authorized to obtain records
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall obtain or attempt to obtain records
Page 5 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1337
which are made confidential pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 except upon
proper motion to a court of competent jurisdiction.
(12)[(11)] No person shall destroy or attempt to destroy any record required to be kept
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 unless the destruction is permitted pursuant to
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and is authorized by the court upon proper motion and
good cause for the destruction being shown.
(13)[(12)] As used in this section the term "KRS Chapters 600 to 645" includes any
administrative regulations which are lawfully promulgated pursuant to KRS
Chapters 600 to 645.
(14)[(13)] Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a crime victim from
speaking publicly after the adjudication about his or her case on matters within his
or her knowledge or on matters disclosed to the victim during any aspect of a
juvenile court proceeding.
Page 6 of 6
BR133700.100 - 1337 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:24 PM Jacketed